Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4103
Dry Pea and Lentil Commission, created.

The Dry Pea and Lentil Commission is created. Members shall be appointed to the commission by the Governor pursuant to section 2-4104.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 3.
November 14, 2020